Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-520
Automobile liability policy; cancellation; notice of other insurance; contents.

When automobile bodily injury and property damage liability coverage is canceled, other than for nonpayment of premium, or in the event of failure to renew automobile bodily injury and property damage liability coverage to which section 44-517 applies, the insurer shall notify the named insured of the insured's possible eligibility for automobile liability insurance through an affiliated insurer or the automobile liability assigned risk plan. Such notice shall accompany or be included in the notice of cancellation or the notice of intent not to renew.

Laws 1972, LB 1396, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 360, § 4.